Illinois, session 104th, HB1917.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-169 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-169)7    Sec. 15-169. Homestead exemption for veterans with 8disabilities and veterans of World War II.9    (a) Beginning with taxable year 2007, an annual homestead 10exemption, limited as provided in this Section, is granted for 11property that is used as a qualified residence by a veteran 12with a disability, and beginning with taxable year 2024, an 13annual homestead exemption, limited to the amounts set forth 14in subsection (b-4), is granted for property that is used as a 15qualified residence by a veteran who was a member of the United 16States Armed Forces during World War II.17    (b) For taxable years prior to 2015, the amount of the 18exemption under this Section is as follows:19        (1) for veterans with a service-connected disability 20    of at least (i) 75% for exemptions granted in taxable 21    years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% for exemptions 22    granted in taxable year 2010 and each taxable year 23    thereafter, as certified by the United States Department   HB1917- 2 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1    of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is $5,000; and2        (2) for veterans with a service-connected disability 3    of at least 50%, but less than (i) 75% for exemptions 4    granted in taxable years 2007 through 2009 and (ii) 70% 5    for exemptions granted in taxable year 2010 and each 6    taxable year thereafter, as certified by the United States 7    Department of Veterans Affairs, the annual exemption is 8    $2,500.9    (b-3) For taxable years 2015 through 2022:10        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 11    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 12    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 13    annual exemption is $2,500;14        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 15    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 16    United States Department of Veterans Affairs, then the 17    annual exemption is $5,000;18        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 19    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 20    Department of Veterans Affairs, then the property is 21    exempt from taxation under this Code; and22        (4) (Blank). 23    (b-3.1) For taxable year 2023 and thereafter: 24        (1) if the veteran has a service connected disability 25    of 30% or more but less than 50%, as certified by the 26    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the   HB1917- 3 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 2    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 3    annual exemption is $2,500; 4        (2) if the veteran has a service connected disability 5    of 50% or more but less than 70%, as certified by the 6    United States Department of Veterans Affairs as of the 7    date the application is submitted for the exemption under 8    this Section for the applicable taxable year, then the 9    annual exemption is $5,000; 10        (3) if the veteran has a service connected disability 11    of 70% or more, as certified by the United States 12    Department of Veterans Affairs as of the date the 13    application is submitted for the exemption under this 14    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 15    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 16    exempt from taxation under this Code; and 17        (4) if the taxpayer is the surviving spouse of a 18    veteran whose death was determined to be service-connected 19    and who is certified by the United States Department of 20    Veterans Affairs as a recipient of dependency and 21    indemnity compensation under federal law as of the date 22    the application is submitted for the exemption under this 23    Section for the applicable taxable year, then the first 24    $250,000 in equalized assessed value of the property is 25    also exempt from taxation under this Code. 26    This amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall   HB1917- 4 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1not be used as the basis for any appeal filed with the chief 2county assessment officer, the board of review, the Property 3Tax Appeal Board, or the circuit court with respect to the 4scope or meaning of the exemption under this Section for a tax 5year prior to tax year 2023. 6    (b-4) For taxable years on or after 2024, if the veteran 7was a member of the United States Armed Forces during World War 8II, then the property is exempt from taxation under this Code 9regardless of the veteran's level of disability. 10    (b-5) If a homestead exemption is granted under this 11Section and the person awarded the exemption subsequently 12becomes a resident of a facility licensed under the Nursing 13Home Care Act or a facility operated by the United States 14Department of Veterans Affairs, then the exemption shall 15continue (i) so long as the residence continues to be occupied 16by the qualifying person's spouse or (ii) if the residence 17remains unoccupied but is still owned by the person who 18qualified for the homestead exemption. 19    (c) The tax exemption under this Section carries over to 20the benefit of the veteran's surviving spouse as long as the 21spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead, 22permanently resides thereon, and does not remarry. If the 23surviving spouse sells the property, an exemption not to 24exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem tax 25roll may be transferred to his or her new residence as long as 26it is used as his or her primary residence and he or she does   HB1917- 5 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1not remarry.2    As used in this subsection (c):3        (1) for taxable years prior to 2015, "surviving 4    spouse" means the surviving spouse of a veteran who 5    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 6    her death;7        (2) for taxable years 2015 through 2022, "surviving 8    spouse" means (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 9    obtained an exemption under this Section prior to his or 10    her death and (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 11    was killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 12    expiration of the application period in effect for the 13    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 14    sought; and15        (3) for taxable year 2023 and thereafter, "surviving 16    spouse" means: (i) the surviving spouse of a veteran who 17    obtained the exemption under this Section prior to his or 18    her death; (ii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who was 19    killed in the line of duty at any time prior to the 20    expiration of the application period in effect for the 21    exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 22    sought; (iii) the surviving spouse of a veteran who did 23    not obtain an exemption under this Section before death, 24    but who would have qualified for the exemption under this 25    Section in the taxable year for which the exemption is 26    sought if he or she had survived, and, except as otherwise   HB1917- 6 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1    provided in this paragraph (3), whose surviving spouse has 2    been a resident of Illinois from the time of the veteran's 3    death through the taxable year for which the exemption is 4    sought; and (iv) the surviving spouse of a veteran whose 5    death was determined to be service-connected, but who 6    would not otherwise qualify under item (i), (ii), or 7    (iii), if the spouse (A) is certified by the United States 8    Department of Veterans Affairs as a recipient of 9    dependency and indemnity compensation under federal law at 10    any time prior to the expiration of the application period 11    in effect for the exemption for the taxable year for which 12    the exemption is sought and (B) remains eligible for that 13    dependency and indemnity compensation as of January 1 of 14    the taxable year for which the exemption is sought. 15    Beginning in taxable year 2025, the requirement that the 16    surviving spouse must be a resident of Illinois from the 17    time of the veteran's death through the taxable year for 18    which the exemption is sought does not apply if the 19    veteran was killed in the line of duty. 20    (c-1) Beginning with taxable year 2015, nothing in this 21Section shall require the veteran to have qualified for or 22obtained the exemption before death if the veteran was killed 23in the line of duty. 24    (d) The exemption under this Section applies for taxable 25year 2007 and thereafter. A taxpayer who claims an exemption 26under Section 15-165 or 15-168 may not claim an exemption   HB1917- 7 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1under this Section.2    (e) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (e), 3each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under this 4Section must reapply on an annual basis, except that a veteran 5who qualifies as a result of his or her service in World War II 6need not reapply. Application must be made during the 7application period in effect for the county of his or her 8residence. The assessor or chief county assessment officer may 9determine the eligibility of residential property to receive 10the homestead exemption provided by this Section by 11application, visual inspection, questionnaire, or other 12reasonable methods. The determination must be made in 13accordance with guidelines established by the Department.14    On and after May 23, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 15102-895), if a veteran has a combined service connected 16disability rating of 100% and is deemed to be permanently and 17totally disabled, as certified by the United States Department 18of Veterans Affairs, the taxpayer who has been granted an 19exemption under this Section shall no longer be required to 20reapply for the exemption on an annual basis, and the 21exemption shall be in effect for as long as the exemption would 22otherwise be permitted under this Section. 23    (e-1) If the person qualifying for the exemption does not 24occupy the qualified residence as of January 1 of the taxable 25year, the exemption granted under this Section shall be 26prorated on a monthly basis. The prorated exemption shall   HB1917- 8 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1apply beginning with the first complete month in which the 2person occupies the qualified residence. 3    (e-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 4chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 5the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 6that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 7year, provided that: 8        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 9    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 10    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 11        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 12    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 13    as of January 1, 2019; 14        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 15    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 16    this Code; and 17        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 18    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 19    taxable years. 20    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 21service connected disability rating has changed since the 2019 22exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 23the subsequent service connected disability rating. 24    (e-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 25chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 26the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property   HB1917- 9 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 2year, if:3        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 4    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 5    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;6        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 7    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 8    as of January 1, 2020;9        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 10    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 11    this Code; and12        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 13    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 14    taxable years.15    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude a veteran whose 16service connected disability rating has changed since the 2020 17exemption was granted from applying for the exemption based on 18the subsequent service connected disability rating. 19    (f) For the purposes of this Section:20    "Qualified residence" means, before tax year 2023, real 21property, but less any portion of that property that is used 22for commercial purposes, with an equalized assessed value of 23less than $250,000 that is the primary residence of a veteran 24with a disability. "Qualified residence" means, for tax year 252023 and thereafter, real property, but less any portion of 26that property that is used for commercial purposes, that is   HB1917- 10 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1the primary residence of a veteran with a disability. Property 2rented for more than 6 months is presumed to be used for 3commercial purposes.4    "Service-connected disability" means an illness or injury 5(i) that was caused by or worsened by active military service, 6(ii) that is a current disability as of the date of the 7application for the exemption under this Section for the 8applicable tax year, as demonstrated by the veteran's United 9States Department of Veterans Affairs certification, and (iii) 10for which the veteran receives disability compensation. 11    For tax years 2022 and prior, "veteran" means an Illinois 12resident who has served as a member of the United States Armed 13Forces on active duty or State active duty, a member of the 14Illinois National Guard, or a member of the United States 15Reserve Forces and who has received an honorable discharge. 16For taxable years 2023 and thereafter, "veteran" means an 17Illinois resident who has served as a member of the United 18States Armed Forces on active duty or State active duty, a 19member of the Illinois National Guard, or a member of the 20United States Reserve Forces and who has a service-connected 21disability, as certified by the United States Department of 22Veterans Affairs, and receives disability compensation. For 23taxable years 2025 and thereafter, "veteran" also includes a 24person who: (i) served as a member of the United States Armed 25Forces on active duty or State active duty, as a member of the 26National Guard of any state or any territory of the United   HB1917- 11 -LRB104 08733 HLH 18787 b1States, or as a member of the United States Reserve Forces; 2(ii) was killed in the line of duty, as certified by the United 3States Department of Veterans Affairs, at any time prior to 4the expiration of the application period in effect for the 5exemption for the taxable year for which the exemption is 6sought; and (iii) was not an Illinois resident at the time of 7the person's death. 8(Source: P.A. 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 102-895, eff. 5-23-22; 9103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-596, eff. 7-1-24.)